Mississippi, session 2026, HB554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 43-12-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-12-33.  The Department of Human Services * * *shall not may establish or use a * * *simplified combination of reporting systems under 7 CFR Section 273.12(a)(5).  The combination, including the extent to which each reporting system is established and used, shall be set by the department.  The department shall provide a written report by September 1 of each year to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Appropriations Committees, the House Public Health and Human Services Committee and the Senate Public Health and Welfare Committee, and the House and Senate Medicaid Committees, on the * * *costs and state and federal savings of not using a simplified rationale, application and effectiveness of using a combined reporting system, including the effect, if any, on enrollment in the SNAP program and the effect on the department's "error rate" as calculated by the Food and Nutrition Service of the United States Department of Agriculture.  The report also shall be provided to the other members of the Legislature upon request. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.